Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-367
Cost of patient care; relatives; limitation.

The liability of each relative, except a spouse, shall cease when relatives shall have completed payments assessed pursuant to sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 for one hundred eighty months, or when the patient attains the age of majority, whichever shall occur first.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 5, p. 3053;

Laws 1976, LB 620, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 34.
July 18, 2026